Massachusetts, session 194th, H5218.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after section
67, the following section:-
Section 68. Subject to appropriation, the Massachusetts Department of Environmental
Protection shall establish a competitive grant program to provide funding to Massachusetts small
businesses for the transition to a circular economy. Circular economy is defined as an economy
that keeps material, products, and services in circulation for as long as possible. The department
shall promulgate regulations to support the creation of the program. The department shall be
authorized to accept applications from businesses that are incorporated in, are properly licensed
to do business in, or have a location in Massachusetts. All grants made under this program
should provide a measurable economic benefit to Massachusetts.
The department shall evaluate a list of criteria in awarding grant applications. The
department shall prioritize applications that fall under any of the following categories:
applications that are from (i) certified minority-owned and women-owned business enterprises;
of 3

(ii) businesses that are geographically located within an environmental justice population; and
(iii) businesses that provide substantial benefit to environmental justice populations, as long as
these applications meet all other necessary criteria. Environmental justice populations are
defined in section 56 of chapter 8. The department is authorized to use its discretion to decide
between applications of similar standing.
SECTION 2. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after
section 28, the following section:-
Section 29. Subject to appropriation, the Secretary of Energy and Environmental Affairs
shall establish a grant program to provide funding to Massachusetts non-profits, academic
institutions, and businesses to conduct scientific research and the research and development of
new technology created for the purpose of improving ocean health and the responsible use of the
ocean. This funding may be used for scientific studies and other research, research and
development of new technology, investment into existing beneficial technology, expansion of
existing beneficial technology, or research into how the technology affects the Commonwealth,
the state economy, or particular industries. The department shall promulgate rules and
regulations to support the creation of a grant program. The department shall accept applications
from entities that are incorporated in, are properly licensed to do business in, or have a location
in Massachusetts. All grants made under this program should provide a measurable economic
benefit to the Massachusetts ocean economy.
In awarding grant funding, the Secretary shall prioritize projects with the most
measurable benefit to the ocean environment, marine species, or coastal communities; projects
using existing technology that is identified as the best available prototype in the field; projects
of 3

with outcomes that promote equity and inclusivity; projects that promote the use of time-series
data. Applications that satisfy one or more of these criteria shall be considered favorably in
priority of awards for funding, so long as those applications meet all other necessary criteria. The
Secretary is authorized to use her discretion to decide between applications of similar standing.
SECTION 3. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding, after section
1T, the following section:-
Section 1U. Subject to appropriation, there shall be within the Massachusetts Department
of Elementary and Secondary Education a Blue Economy Education Fund to be used to provide
funding to the Commonwealth’s high schools to expand educational development, workforce
training, and job placement programs in blue-STEAM industries. Blue-STEAM industries are
defined as ocean sector jobs in science, technology, engineering, art, and mathematics.
The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall create an application
process for interested high schools to apply to the Blue Economy Education Fund. All funding
shall be prioritized to applications by high schools located within an environmental justice
community or composed of a substantial number of students from environmental justice
communities, as defined in section 62 of chapter 30 as amended by Chapter 8 of the Acts of
2021.
of 3